Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1802
Inquest; warrant; form.

The warrant may be in substance as follows: The State of Nebraska, ............. County. To any sheriff of such county:

In the name of the people of the State of Nebraska, you are hereby required to summon six residents of your county to appear before me at .........., on the ...... day of .......... 20...., then and there to hold an inquest upon the dead body of ................, there lying, and by what means such person died. Witness my hand this ...... day of ........ A.D. 20.... . ........... Coroner.

Laws 1879, § 98, p. 381;

R.S.1913, § 5664;

C.S.1922, § 4994;

C.S.1929, § 26-1503;

R.S.1943, § 23-1802;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 70;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 8.

Jurors must obey venire of coroner, and are entitled to fees though it was unnecessary to summon them. Moore v. Box Butte County, 78 Neb. 561, 111 N.W. 469 (1907).